Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 9

Poverty Reduction Plan

71-5-901. Commissioner of human services to conduct study of poverty.

The commissioner of human services shall complete a study of poverty in Tennessee, including its implications and potential solution strategies with feedback from departments, agencies, and selected non-governmental organizations serving the affected populations. Such departments, agencies and organizations shall include, but not be limited to the following:

Department of children's services;

Department of health;

The bureau of TennCare;

Department of economic and community development;

The Tennessee commission on children and youth;

The Tennessee commission on aging and disability;

The Room in the Inn program of Middle Tennessee;

The Catholic Charities in Tennessee;

The Area Relief Ministries of Jackson, Tennessee;

The Second Harvest Food Bank of Tennessee;

The Neighborhood Christian Center of Memphis, Tennessee; and

The Regional Interfaith Alliance of Jackson, Tennessee.

Acts 2014, ch. 934, § 1.

71-5-902. Poverty reduction plan.

The poverty reduction plan shall:

Assess the current and future impact of poverty on the residents of Tennessee;

Examine the existing barriers, services and resources addressing the needs of persons living in poverty and their families; and

Develop a proposed strategy to mobilize the state response to the poverty crisis;

The poverty reduction plan shall include an examination of the following in its assessment and recommendations:

A determination of the economic and human impact of poverty in this state;

A review of the remedies to reduce the number of individuals and families living in poverty in this state;

Information to be utilized as potential legislative remedies for consideration in the one hundred ninth general assembly; and

Needed state policies or responses, including directions for the provision of clear and coordinated services and support to persons living in poverty and strategies to address any identified gaps in services.

Acts 2014, ch. 934, § 1.

71-5-903. Deadline for submission of findings and recommendations.

The commissioner and other departments, agencies and selected non-governmental organizations conducting the study shall hold a public meeting and utilize technological means to gather feedback on the recommendations from the general public and from persons and families affected by poverty.

The department shall submit its findings and recommendations to the governor and the general assembly in the form of a state anti-poverty plan by January 15, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 934, § 1.